Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB358.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 301. Adoption by regulations.* * *(c.1) Standards for elevators in apartment buildings and condominiums.--(1) The department shall, within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, promulgate regulations requiring a newly constructed apartment building or condominium that is at least two stories above grade to have 12345678910111213141516171819 no less than two elevators within one year from the effective date of the regulations.(2) The regulations promulgated under paragraph (1) shall include a provision that the owner of a newly constructed apartment building or condominium shall ensure that at least one elevator is operational, unless the circumstances that caused the elevators to stop operation were out of the control of the owner.(3) This subsection shall apply to apartment buildings or condominiums constructed on or after the effective date of the regulations.(4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apartment building." A structure, or portion of the structure, that is intended or designed to be occupied or leased for occupation, or is actually occupied, as a residence for three or more households living in separate habitable spaces."Condominium." As defined in 68 Pa.C.S. § 3103 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0358PN0312 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223